Missouri, session 2026, SB1251.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 230.205, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 230.205,
to read as follows:
230.205. 1. The alternative county highway commission
provided by sections 230.200 to 230.260 shall not become
operative in any county unless adopted by a vote of the
majority of the voters of the county voting upon the
question at an election. All counties of this state which
have adopted the alternative county highway commission may
abolish it [and return to the county highway commission
provided for by sections 230.010 to 230.110] by submitting
the question to a vote of the voters of the county in the
manner provided by law or by a vote of the governing body.
2. Any county which does not adopt the alternative
county highway commission provided by sections 230.200 to
230.260, or any county in which [a majority of the voters of
the county voting upon the question reject] the alternative
county highway commission provided by sections 230.200 to
230.260 is abolished, shall [retain] adopt either the county
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1251 2
highway commission provided by sections 230.010 to 230.110
or the provisions of sections 231.010 to 231.130.
✓